Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers
§ 218.
Jurisdiction over charges and rates.

When, after opportunity for hearing, the rates, tolls, charges, or schedules are found unjust, unreasonable, insufficient, or unjustly discriminatory, or are found to be preferential or otherwise in violation of a provision of this chapter, the Commission may order and substitute therefor such rates, tolls, charges, or schedules, and make such changes in any regulations, measurements, practices, or acts of such company relating to its service, and may make such order as will compel the furnishing of such adequate service as shall at such hearing be found by it to be just and reasonable. This section shall not be construed to require the same rates, tolls, or charges from any company subject to supervision under this chapter for like service in different parts of the State, but the Commission in determining these questions shall investigate local conditions and its final findings and judgment shall take cognizance thereof. This section does not prohibit a telecommunications company from filing tariffs that condition the availability of an intrastate service upon subscription to an interstate or unregulated service from the same or an affiliated company; provided that an incumbent local exchange carrier shall provide a plan to allocate reasonably revenue between the regulated intrastate service and other services. The Commission shall retain the authority to review the tariff filing to determine whether it is just and reasonable.

The Department of Public Service shall propose, and the Commission through the establishment of rates of return, rates, tolls, charges, or schedules shall encourage the implementation by electric and gas utilities of energy-efficiency and load management measures which will be cost-effective for the utilities and their customers on a life cycle cost basis. The Commission shall approve rate designs to encourage the efficient use of natural gas and electricity, including consideration of the creation of an inclining block rate structure for residential rate customers with an initial block of low-cost power available to all residences.

To implement the requirements of this subsection, the Public Utility Commission shall continue its investigation of the following:

the parameters for residential inclining block rate designs;

alternative rate designs, such as critical peak pricing programs or more widespread use of time-of-day rates, that would encourage more efficient use of electricity;

the possible inclusion of exemptions from otherwise applicable inclining block rates or rate designs to encourage efficiency for situations in which special health needs or another extraordinary situation presents such a significant demand for electricity that the Commission determines use of those rates would cause undue financial hardship for the customer.

By December 31, 2008, the Commission shall issue a report and plan for implementation based upon the results of its investigation. The plan shall require each retail company to upgrade its rates as necessary to implement new rate designs appropriate to encourage efficient energy use, which shall include residential inclining block rates, if the Commission determines that those rates would be appropriate, by a specified date, or as part of its next rate-related appearance before the Commission, or according to a timetable otherwise specified by the Commission. In implementing these rate designs, the Commission shall consider the appropriateness of phasing in the rate design changes to allow large users of energy a reasonable opportunity to employ methods of conservation and energy efficiency in advance of the full effect of the changes.

Smart grid. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an applicant may propose and the Commission may approve or require an applicant to adopt a rate design that includes dynamic pricing, such as real-time pricing rates. Under such circumstances, the Commission may alter or waive the notice and filing provisions that would apply otherwise under section 225 of this title, provided the applicant ensures that each customer receives sufficient advance notice of the time-of-day usage rates.

The Public Utility Commission shall take any action necessary to enable the State of Vermont and telecommunications companies offering service in Vermont to participate in the federal Lifeline program administered by the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) or its agent and also the Vermont Lifeline program described in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(c) (1) The Public Utility Commission shall take any action necessary to enable the State of Vermont and telecommunications companies offering service in Vermont to participate in the federal Lifeline program administered by the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) or its agent and also the Vermont Lifeline program described in subdivision (2) of this subsection.

A household that qualifies for participation in the federal Lifeline program under criteria established by the FCC or other federal law or regulation shall also be eligible to receive a Vermont Lifeline benefit for wireline voice telephone service. The Vermont Lifeline benefit established under this subdivision shall be set at an amount not to exceed the benefit provided to a household as of October 31, 2017, or $4.25, whichever is greater, and shall be applied as a supplement to any wireline voice benefit received through participation in the federal Lifeline program. However, in no event shall the aggregate amount of benefits received through the federal and State programs described in this subdivision exceed a household’s monthly basic service charge for wireline services, including any standard usage and mileage charges.

A company designated as an eligible telecommunications carrier by the Commission pursuant to

47 U.S.C. § 214(e)

shall verify an applicant’s eligibility for receipt of federal or State Lifeline benefits as required by federal law or regulation or as directed by the Vermont Agency of Human Services, as applicable. The Agency shall provide the FCC or its agent with categorical eligibility data regarding an applicant’s status in qualifying programs administered by the Agency.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this subsection to the contrary, a subscriber who is enrolled in the Lifeline program and has obtained a final relief from abuse order in accordance with the provisions of 15 V.S.A. chapter 21 or 33 V.S.A. chapter 69 shall qualify for a Lifeline benefit credit for the amount of the incremental charges imposed by the local telecommunications company for treating the number of the subscriber as nonpublished and any charges required to change from a published to a nonpublished number. As used in this section, “nonpublished” means that the customer’s telephone number is not listed in any published directories, is not listed on directory assistance records of the company, and is not made available on request by a member of the general public, notwithstanding any claim of emergency a requesting party may present. The Department for Children and Families shall develop an application form and certification process for obtaining this Lifeline benefit credit.

[Repealed.]

The Commission may permit recovery in a company’s rates of all or a reasonable portion of the company’s expenditures directly related to aesthetic improvements of utility substations, provided that such aesthetic improvements are incidental to other necessary expenditures at or in the vicinity of the substation.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the Commission, on its own motion or upon petition of any person, may issue an order approving a rate schedule, tariff, agreement, contract, or settlement that provides reduced rates for low-income electric utility consumers better to assure affordability. As used in this subsection, “low-income electric utility consumer” means a customer who has a household income at or below 185 percent of the current federal poverty level. When considering whether to approve a rate schedule, tariff, agreement, contract, or settlement for low-income electric utility consumers, the Commission shall take into account the potential impact on, and cost-shifting to, other utility customers.

Regulatory incentives for renewable generation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an electric distribution utility subject to rate regulation under this chapter shall be entitled to recover in rates its prudently incurred costs in applying for and seeking any certificate, permit, or other regulatory approval issued or to be issued by federal, State, or local government for the construction of new renewable energy to be sited in Vermont, regardless of whether the certificate, permit, or other regulatory approval ultimately is granted.

The Commission is authorized to provide to an electric distribution utility subject to rate regulation under this chapter an incentive rate of return on equity or other reasonable incentive on any capital investment made by such utility in a renewable energy generation facility sited in Vermont.

To encourage joint efforts on the part of electric distribution utilities to support renewable energy and to secure stable, long-term contracts beneficial to Vermonters, the Commission may establish standards for preapproving the recovery of costs incurred on a renewable energy plant that is the subject of that joint effort, if the construction of the plant requires a certificate of public good under section 248 of this title and all or part of the electricity generated by the plant will be under contract to the utilities involved in that joint effort.

In this subsection, “plant,” “renewable energy,” and “new renewable energy” shall be as defined in section 8002 of this title.

Each company subject to the Public Utility Commission’s jurisdiction that distributes electrical energy shall have in place a rate schedule for street lighting that provides an option under which efficient streetlights, including light-emitting diode (LED) lights, are installed on company-owned fixtures. These rate schedules also shall include a separate option under which customers may own street lighting and install efficient streetlights, including LED lights, on customer-owned fixtures.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1981, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 13

, eff. April 11, 1985;

1985, No. 48

, § 2;

1985, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), eff. May 13, 1986;

1989, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 1, 1992;

1995, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1997, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1999, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 273;

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 5, 16;

2003, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 58;

2003, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 13, 13a;

2009, No. 45

, § 6, eff. May 27, 2009;

2009, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. April 15, 2010;

2011, No. 47

, § 20f, eff. May 25, 2011;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. May 14, 2012;

2013, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 56

, § 16;

2017, No. 41

, § 2, eff. Nov. 1, 2017;

2021, No. 42

, § 5, eff. May 20, 2021.

§ 218a.
Permanent telecommunications relay service.

The Department of Public Service shall develop the necessary standards for the establishment of a permanent, statewide telecommunications relay service and for an associated equipment program.
(a) (1) The Department of Public Service shall develop the necessary standards for the establishment of a permanent, statewide telecommunications relay service and for an associated equipment program.

The standards developed by the Department shall be equal to or exceed those standards mandated by the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327 (1990)) and expressly require that the designated provider of Vermont’s telecommunications relay services comply, as expeditiously as possible, with any additional federal regulations that may be promulgated by the Federal Communications Commission in accordance with the provisions of this section.

The Department of Public Service shall issue a request for proposal seeking competitive bids from qualified vendors to provide telecommunications relay services and competitive bids from qualified vendors to provide telecommunications equipment in accordance with the provisions of this section, including the standards developed under subsection (a) of this section. The term of any contract shall not exceed four years.

The Department of Public Service may contract with the qualified bidder offering the most favorable proposal, giving due consideration to costs, to quality of service, and to the interests of the community of people who are deaf, hard of hearing, or have speech limitations.

The Department of Public Service shall establish the Vermont Telecommunications Relay Service Advisory Council composed of the following members: one representative of the Department of Public Service designated by the Commissioner of Public Service; one representative of the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living; two representatives of the deaf community; one member of the community of people who are hard of hearing or have a speech limitation; one representative of a company providing local exchange service within the State; and one representative of an organization currently providing telecommunications relay services.
(d) (1) The Department of Public Service shall establish the Vermont Telecommunications Relay Service Advisory Council composed of the following members: one representative of the Department of Public Service designated by the Commissioner of Public Service; one representative of the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living; two representatives of the deaf community; one member of the community of people who are hard of hearing or have a speech limitation; one representative of a company providing local exchange service within the State; and one representative of an organization currently providing telecommunications relay services.

The Council shall elect from among its members a chair and vice chair. Meetings shall be convened at the call of the Chair or a majority of the members of the Council. The Council shall meet not more than six times a year.
(2) (A) The Council shall elect from among its members a chair and vice chair. Meetings shall be convened at the call of the Chair or a majority of the members of the Council. The Council shall meet not more than six times a year.

The members of the Council who are not officers or employees of the State shall receive per diem compensation and expense reimbursement in amounts authorized by

32 V.S.A. § 1010(b)

. The costs of the compensation and reimbursement and any other necessary administrative costs shall be included within the contract entered into under subsection (c) of this section.

The Council shall advise the Department of Public Service and the contractor for telecommunications relay services on all matters concerning the implementation and administration of the State’s telecommunications relay service, including the telecommunications equipment grant program established pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

The Department shall propose and the Commission shall establish by rule or order a telecommunications equipment grant program to assist persons who are deaf, deaf-blind, hard of hearing, have a speech limitation, and persons with physical disabilities that limit their ability to use standard telephone equipment to communicate by telephone.
(e) (1) The Department shall propose and the Commission shall establish by rule or order a telecommunications equipment grant program to assist persons who are deaf, deaf-blind, hard of hearing, have a speech limitation, and persons with physical disabilities that limit their ability to use standard telephone equipment to communicate by telephone.

Pursuant to this program, a person who is deaf, deaf-blind, hard of hearing, has a speech limitation, or a person with a physical disability that limits his or her ability to use standard telephone equipment whose modified adjusted gross income as defined in

32 V.S.A. § 5829(b)(1)

for the preceding taxable year was less than 200 percent of the official poverty line established by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services for a family of six or the actual number in the family, whichever is greater, published as of October 1 of the preceding taxable year, may be eligible for a benefit toward the purchase, upgrade, or repair of equipment used to access the relay service or otherwise communicate by telephone. The total benefits allocable under this subsection shall not exceed $75,000.00 per year.

In adopting rules, the Commission shall consider the following:

prior benefits;

degree of functional need;

income;

number of applicants;

disposition of equipment upon change of residence; and

appropriate limits on per person benefit levels based on the equipment needed and the income level of the applicant.

The costs of the State’s telecommunications relay service and any equipment benefit under subsection (e) of this section shall be included as part of the Vermont Universal Service Fund Program.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 6

, § 2, eff. March 20, 1991; amended

1997, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1999, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2001, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 59;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 192;

2017, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 2, 2018;

2019, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 218b.
Farm customers; energy efficiency; electric energy generation.

Each Vermont electric distribution utility shall develop and implement comprehensive energy efficiency programs for its livestock and domestic fowl farm customers. Such programs shall include all program measures that the Public Utility Commission determines will be cost-effective as part of the utility’s least-cost integrated plan. Utilities shall file such proposed programs by August 1, 1991. The Commission shall require each utility to deliver approved program measures to farm customers as rapidly as possible thereafter, taking into consideration the need for these services, utility financial constraints, and cost-effective delivery mechanisms.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 98

; amended

1997, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 21, 1998.

§ 218c.
Least-cost integrated planning.

A “least-cost integrated plan” for a regulated electric or gas utility is a plan for meeting the public’s need for energy services, after safety concerns are addressed, at the lowest present value life cycle cost, including environmental and economic costs, through a strategy combining investments and expenditures on energy supply, transmission, and distribution capacity, transmission and distribution efficiency, and comprehensive energy efficiency programs. Economic costs shall be assessed with due regard to:
(a) (1) A “least-cost integrated plan” for a regulated electric or gas utility is a plan for meeting the public’s need for energy services, after safety concerns are addressed, at the lowest present value life cycle cost, including environmental and economic costs, through a strategy combining investments and expenditures on energy supply, transmission, and distribution capacity, transmission and distribution efficiency, and comprehensive energy efficiency programs. Economic costs shall be assessed with due regard to:

the greenhouse gas inventory developed under the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 582

;

the State’s progress in meeting its greenhouse gas reduction goals;

the value of the financial risks associated with greenhouse gas emissions from various power sources; and

consistency with section 8001 (renewable energy goals) of this title.

“Comprehensive energy efficiency programs” shall mean a coordinated set of investments or program expenditures made by a regulated electric or gas utility or other entity as approved by the Commission pursuant to subsection 209(d) of this title to meet the public’s need for energy services through efficiency, conservation, or load management in all customer classes and areas of opportunity which is designed to acquire the full amount of cost-effective savings from such investments or programs.

Each regulated electric or gas company shall prepare and implement a least-cost integrated plan for the provision of energy services to its Vermont customers. At least every third year on a schedule directed by the Public Utility Commission, each such company shall submit a proposed plan to the Department of Public Service and the Public Utility Commission. The Commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may approve a company’s least-cost integrated plan if it determines that the company’s plan complies with the requirements of subdivision (a)(1) of this section and of sections 8004 and 8005 of this title and is consistent with the goals of the Comprehensive Energy Plan issued under section 202b of this title.

[Repealed.]

Least-cost transmission services shall be provided in accordance with this subsection. On or before July 1, 2006, any electric company that does not have a designated retail service territory and that owns or operates electric transmission facilities within the State of Vermont, in conjunction with any other electric companies that own or operate these facilities, jointly shall prepare and file with the Department of Public Service and the Public Utility Commission a Transmission System Plan that looks forward for a period of at least 10 years. A copy of the plan shall be filed with each of the following: the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development and on Energy and Technology and the Senate Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy. The objective of the Plan shall be to identify the potential need for transmission system improvements as early as possible, in order to allow sufficient time to plan and implement more cost-effective nontransmission alternatives to meet reliability needs, wherever feasible. The Plan shall:
(d) (1) Least-cost transmission services shall be provided in accordance with this subsection. On or before July 1, 2006, any electric company that does not have a designated retail service territory and that owns or operates electric transmission facilities within the State of Vermont, in conjunction with any other electric companies that own or operate these facilities, jointly shall prepare and file with the Department of Public Service and the Public Utility Commission a Transmission System Plan that looks forward for a period of at least 10 years. A copy of the plan shall be filed with each of the following: the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development and on Energy and Technology and the Senate Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy. The objective of the Plan shall be to identify the potential need for transmission system improvements as early as possible, in order to allow sufficient time to plan and implement more cost-effective nontransmission alternatives to meet reliability needs, wherever feasible. The Plan shall:

identify existing and potential transmission system reliability deficiencies by location within Vermont;

estimate the date, and identify the local or regional load levels and other likely system conditions at which these reliability deficiencies, in the absence of further action, would likely occur;

describe the likely manner of resolving the identified deficiencies through transmission system improvements;

estimate the likely costs of these improvements;

identify potential obstacles to the realization of these improvements; and

identify the demand or supply parameters that generation, demand response, energy efficiency, or other nontransmission strategies would need to address to resolve the reliability deficiencies identified.

Prior to the adoption of any Transmission System Plan, a utility preparing a Plan shall host at least two public meetings at which it shall present a draft of the Plan and facilitate a public discussion to identify and evaluate nontransmission alternatives. The meetings shall be at separate locations within the State, in proximity to the transmission facilities involved or as otherwise required by the Commission, and each shall be noticed by at least two advertisements, each occurring between one and three weeks prior to the meetings, in newspapers having general circulation within the State and within the municipalities in which the meetings are to be held. Copies of the notices shall be provided to the Public Utility Commission, the Department of Public Service, any entity appointed by the Public Utility Commission pursuant to subdivision 209(d)(2) of this title, the Agency of Natural Resources, the Division for Historic Preservation, the Department of Health, the Agency of Transportation, the Attorney General, the chair of each regional planning commission, each retail electricity provider within the State, and any public interest group that requests, or has made a standing request for, a copy of the notice. A verbatim transcript of the meetings shall be prepared by the utility preparing the Plan, shall be filed with the Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service, and shall be provided at cost to any person requesting it. The Plan shall contain a discussion of the principal contentions made at the meetings by members of the public, by any State agency, and by any utility.

Prior to the issuance of the Transmission Plan or any revision of the Plan, the utility preparing the Plan shall offer to meet with each retail electricity provider within the State, with any entity appointed by the Public Utility Commission pursuant to subdivision 209(d)(2) of this title, and with the Department of Public Service, for the purpose of exchanging information that may be relevant to the development of the Plan.

A Transmission System Plan shall be revised:
(4) (A) A Transmission System Plan shall be revised:

within nine months of a request to do so made by either the Public Utility Commission or the Department of Public Service; and

in any case, at intervals of not more than three years.

If more than 18 months shall have elapsed between the adoption of any version of the Plan and the next revision of the Plan, or since the last public hearing to address a proposed revision of the Plan and facilitate a public discussion that identifies and evaluates nontransmission alternatives, the utility preparing the Plan, prior to issuing the next revision, shall host public meetings as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, and the revision shall contain a discussion of the principal contentions made at the meetings by members of the public, by any State agency, and by any retail electricity provider.

On the basis of information contained in a Transmission System Plan, obtained through meetings held pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, or obtained otherwise, the Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service shall use their powers under this title to encourage and facilitate the resolution of reliability deficiencies through nontransmission alternatives, where those alternatives would better serve the public good. The Public Utility Commission, upon such notice and hearings as are otherwise required under this title, may enter such orders as it deems necessary to encourage, facilitate, or require the resolution of reliability deficiencies in a manner that it determines will best promote the public good.

The retail electricity providers in affected areas shall incorporate the most recently filed Transmission Plan in their individual least-cost integrated planning processes, and shall cooperate as necessary to develop and implement joint least-cost solutions to address the reliability deficiencies identified in the Transmission Plan.

Before the Department of Public Service takes a position before the Commission concerning the construction of new transmission or a transmission upgrade with significant land use ramifications, the Department shall hold one or more public meetings with the legislative bodies or their designees of each town, village, or city that the transmission lines cross, and shall engage in a discussion with the members of those bodies or their designees and the interested public as to the Department’s role as public advocate.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 99

, § 2; amended

1999, No. 60

, § 2, eff. June 1, 1999;

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2005, No. 61

, § 9;

2007, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2011, No. 62

, § 25;

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2015, No. 40

, § 30;

2015, No. 56

, § 17;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 173b;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.